Utah statutes.
78B-5-612.   Proof of instruments affecting real estate.
An instrument conveying or affecting real property, acknowledged, or proved
and certified as provided by law, may, together with the certificate of
acknowledgment or proof, be read in evidence in an action or proceeding,
without further proof.  The record, or a certified copy of the record, of the
conveyance or instrument acknowledged or proved may be read in evidence, with
the same effect as the original.  The party offering the certified copy shall
prove by affidavit or otherwise, that the original is not in the possession or
under the control of the party.
